District of Columbia statutes.
22-3102

Prohibited acts.

(a)

It shall be unlawful in the District of Columbia for a person knowingly to use a minor in a sexual performance or to promote a sexual performance by a minor.

(1)

A person is guilty of the use of a minor in a sexual performance if knowing the character and content thereof, he or she employs, authorizes, or induces a person under 18 years of age to engage in a sexual performance or being the parent, legal guardian, or custodian of a minor, he or she consents to the participation by a minor in a sexual performance.

(2)

A person is guilty of promoting a sexual performance by a minor when, knowing the character and content thereof, he or she produces, directs, or promotes any performance which includes sexual conduct by a person under 18 years of age.

(b)

It shall be unlawful in the District of Columbia for a person, knowing the character and content thereof, to attend, transmit, or possess a sexual performance by a minor.

(c)

If the sexual performance consists solely of a still or motion picture, then this section:

(1)

Shall not apply to the minor or minors depicted in a still or motion picture who possess it or transmit it to another person unless at least one of the minors depicted in it does not consent to its possession or transmission; and

(2)

Shall not apply to possession of a still or motion picture by a minor, or by an adult not more than 4 years older than the minor or minors depicted in it, who receives it from a minor depicted in it unless the recipient knows that at least one of the minors depicted in the still or motion picture did not consent to its transmission.

(d)

For the purposes of subsections (b) and (c) of this section, the term:

(1)

“Possess,” “possession,” or “possessing” requires accessing the sexual performance if electronically received or available.

(2)

“Still or motion picture” includes a photograph, motion picture, electronic or digital representation, video, or other visual depiction, however produced or reproduced.

(3)

“Transmit” or “transmission” includes distribution, and can occur by any means, including electronically.”.

History

Mar. 9, 1983, D.C. Law 4-173, § 3, 29 DCR 5749
Oct. 23, 2010, D.C. Law 18-239, § 205(b), 57 DCR 5405

Cross References

Sex offender registration, criminal offense against a victim who is a minor, defined, see § 24-4101.

Section References

This section is referenced in § 14-311, § 22-3020.51, § 22-3104, § 22-4001, § 22-4151, and § 23-113.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 22-2012.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 18-239 designated the existing text as subsec. (a); in subsec. (a), substituted “18” for “16”; and added subsecs. (b) to (d).